Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2821
Contracts; changes authorized.

A design-build contract, a progressive design-build contract, and a construction manager-general contractor contract may be conditioned upon later refinements in scope and price and may permit the contracting agency in agreement with the design-builder, progressive design-builder, or construction manager to make changes in the project without invalidating the contract.

Laws 2016, LB960, § 21;

Laws 2019, LB583, § 15;

Laws 2022, LB1016, § 10.